apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="absolut/__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktiv__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grusom__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="modsat__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grimme__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ang__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ængere</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anges</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angt</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ange</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="besked/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rust/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="munt/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gammel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældre</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamles</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammelt</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammel</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamle</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældste</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/god__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedre</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>godt</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>god</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gode</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedste</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedst</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alm/indelig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indeligt</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indelig</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indelige</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indeligste</l>
          <r>indelig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sik/ker__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kert</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ker<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="almindelig"><i>alm</i><par n="alm/indelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alvorlig"><i>alvorlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anonym"><i>anonym</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arabisk"><p><l>arabiske</l><r>arabisk</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="automatisk"><i>automatisk</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bange"><i>bange</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beskeden"><i>besked</i><par n="besked/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bleg"><i>bleg</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blind"><i>blind</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blond"><p><l>blonde</l><r>blond</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brun"><i>brun</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dansk"><i>dansk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="doven"><i>doven</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ejendommelig"><p><l>ejendommeligt</l><r>ejendommelig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrisk"><i>elektrisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eneste"><i>eneste</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="falsk"><i>falsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flittig"><i>flittig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forskellig"><i>forskellig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fransk"><i>fransk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gammel"><i></i><par n="/gammel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gift"><i>gift</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="giftig"><i>giftig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="god"><i></i><par n="/god__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grim"><p><l>grimme</l><r>grim</r></p><par n="grimme__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grusom"><i>grusom</i><par n="grusom__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hel"><i>hel</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hemmelig"><i>hemmelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hollandsk"><i>hollandsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hvid"><i>hvid</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hyggelig"><i>hyggelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="international"><i>international</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jaloux"><i>jaloux</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klassisk"><i>klassisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lang"><i>l</i><par n="l/ang__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="latterlig"><i>latterlig</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="levende"><i>levende</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lig"><i>lig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="livlig"><p><l>livligt</l><r>livlig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="misundelig"><i>misundelig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="moderne"><i>moderne</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modsat"><i>modsat</i><par n="modsat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mulig"><i>mulig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="munter"><i>munt</i><par n="munt/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naturlig"><i>naturlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="norsk"><i>norsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="offensiv"><i>offensiv</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="offentlig"><i>offentlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="personlig"><i>personlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rar"><i>rar</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rund"><i>rund</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="russisk"><p><l>russiske</l><r>russisk</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusten"><i>rust</i><par n="rust/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sandsynlig"><i>sandsynlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sikker"><i>sik</i><par n="sik/ker__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skeptisk"><p><l>skeptiske</l><r>skeptisk</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="social"><i>social</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stum"><p><l>stumme</l><r>stum</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svag"><i>svag</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="syg"><i>syg</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="taknemmelig"><i>taknemmelig</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trist"><i>trist</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tynd"><i>tynd</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="typisk"><i>typisk</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ulykkelig"><i>ulykkelig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="underlig"><p><l>underligt</l><r>underlig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vanskelig"><i>vanskelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="virkelig"><p><l>virkeligt</l><r>virkelig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="voksen"><i>voks</i><par n="besked/en__adj"/></e>
